Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB229.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) If the Governor or the chief executive authority of a city, county, charter county,
urban-county government, consolidated local government, or unified local
government declares an emergency, the owner of a building may offer temporary
shelter to persons, including overnight shelter, if the owner of the building
provides written notice to the local government in which it is immediately located
in the manner designated by that local government.
(2) The city, county, charter county, urban-county government, consolidated local
government, or unified local government shall put in place procedures for owners
of buildings to notify the local government of their intentions to offer shelter
during an emergency.
(3) (a) Any local ordinances or state laws that relate to the occupancy or use of the
building that may be violated by using the building as a temporary shelter in
the manner set out by this section shall be unenforceable during the time an
emergency is declared.
(b) Once an emergency declaration is no longer in effect, all local or state
ordinances or laws relating to the occupancy or use of the building shall be
enforceable.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/17/2025 6:40 PM Jacketed